District of Columbia statutes.
16-4003

Applicability.

This chapter applies to a collaborative law participation agreement that meets the requirements of § 16-4004 signed on or after the effective date of this chapter [May 9, 2012].

History

May 9, 2012, D.C. Law 19-125, § 2(b), 59 DCR 1928

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 3 of the Uniform Collaborative Law Act.